Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.413.100

Promoting the use of paraeducators.

The paraeducator board must promote the use of paraeducators to meet educator workforce needs by:

(1) Communicating to school districts and educational service districts the requirements for requesting a limited teaching certificate on behalf of a paraeducator;

(2) Encouraging and supporting paraeducators to take on the role of teacher under a limited teaching certificate or by enrolling in an alternative route teacher certification program under chapter 28A.660 RCW; and

(3) Supporting school districts and educational service districts in using paraeducators in teacher roles.

[ 2019 c 268 s 1.]